Utah statutes.
26-21b-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Critical access hospital" means a critical access hospital that meets
the criteria of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-4(c)(2)(1998).
(2)  "Designated facility" means:
(a)  a freestanding urgent care center;
(b)  a general acute hospital; or
(c)  a critical access hospital.
(3)  "Emergency contraception" means the use of a substance, approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration, to prevent pregnancy after sexual
intercourse.
(4)  "Freestanding urgent care center" is as defined in Section 59-12-801.
(5)  "General acute hospital" is as defined in Section 26-21-2.
(6)  "Physician" means a person:
(a)  licensed as a physician under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice
Act; or
(b)  licensed as a physician under Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic
Medical Practice Act.
(7)  "Practitioner" means:
(a)  a physician; or
(b)  any other person who is permitted by law to prescribe emergency
contraception.
(8)  "Sexual assault" means any criminal conduct described in Title 76,
Chapter 5, Part 4, Sexual Offenses, that may result in a pregnancy.
(9)  "Victim of sexual assault" means any person who presents to receive, or
receives, medical care in consequence of being subjected to sexual assault.
